Utah statutes.
78B-3-302.   Actions to recover fines or penalties -- Against public
officers.
(1)  Actions to recover fines or penalties shall be tried in the county where
the cause, or some part of the cause, arose.
(2)  If a fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed by statute is imposed for an
offense committed on a lake, river, or other stream of water situated in two
or more counties, the action may be brought in any county bordering on the
lake, river, or stream opposite to the place where the offense was committed.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided by law, an action against a public officer
or the public officer's designee shall be tried in the county where the cause
arose.
